hr-HR: Vrsta gaziranog pića: Kola; Gazirano piće od đumbira; Pivo od đumbira; Limun i limeta; Naranča; Gazirano piće sa sladoledom; Tonik; Ostalo
da: Sodavandsvariant: Cola; Ingefærøl; Ingefærøl; Lemon-lime; Orange; Sodavand; Tonic-vand; Andet
nb: Brusvariant: Cola; Ingefærøl; Ingefærøl; Sitron-lime; Oransje; Bruskrem; Tonicvann; Annet
th: ลักษณะโซดา: โคล่า; จินเจอร์เอล; จินเจอร์เบียร์; น้ำมะนาว; ส้ม; ครีมโซดา; โทนิควอเตอร์; อื่นๆ
nl: Frisdrankvariant: Cola; Ginger ale; Gemberbier; Citroenlimoen; Oranje; Sodacrème; Tonic; Andere
tr: Gazoz Çeşitleri: Kola; Zencefil içkisi; Zencefil birası; Misket limonu; Turuncu; Soda kreması; Tonik suyu; Diğer
sk-SK: Druh sódy: Cola; Zázvorové pivo; Zázvorové pivo; Citrónovo-limetkový; Oranžový; Sóda so zmrzlinou; Tonická voda; Iné
it: Varietà di bibita gassata: Cola; Ginger ale; Ginger beer; Limone e lime; Arancia; Cream soda; Acqua tonica; Altro
fr: Variété de soda: Cola; Ginger ale; Bière de gingembre; Citron vert; Orange; Soda cream; Eau tonique; Autre
sl-SI: Raznolikost sodavice: Cola; Ingverjevo pivo ale; Ingverjevo pivo; Limona-limeta; Pomaranča; Kremna sodavica; Tonik voda; Drugo
ko: 소다 종류: 콜라; 진저 에일; 진저 비어; 레몬라임; 오렌지; 소다 크림; 토닉워터; 기타
pt-PT: Variedade de soda: Coca-cola; Ginger ale; Cerveja de gengibre; Lima-limão; Laranja; Refrigerante; Água tónica; Outro
lt-LT: Gazuotų gėrimų rūšis: Kola; Imbierinis limonadas; Imbierinis alus; Citrinos ir laimai; Gintarinė; Kreminis gazuotas gėrimas; Tonikas; Kita
zh-TW: 碳酸飲料種類: 可樂; 薑汁; 薑汁啤酒; 檸檬萊姆; 橙; 奶油蘇打; 湯寧水; 其他
el: Ποικιλία αναψυκτικού: Κόλα; Τζιτζιμπύρα; Μπύρα τζίντζερ; Λεμόνι-λάιμ; Πορτοκάλι; Κρέμα σόδας; Τονωτικό νερό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sortiment de sifon: Cola; Bere de ghimbir dulce; Bere de ghimbir picantă; Lămâie-limetă; Portocală; Soda cream; Apă tonică; Altele
ru: Разновидность газированного напитка: Кола; Имбирный эль; Имбирное пиво; Лимон-лайм; Апельсин; Крем-сода; Тоник; Другое
ja: ソーダの種類: コーラ; ジンジャーエール; ジンジャービール; レモンライム; オレンジ; ソーダクリーム; トニックウォーター; その他
es: Variedad de gaseosa: Cola; Refresco de jengibre; Cerveza de jengibre; Limón con lima; Naranja; Crema de refresco; Agua tónica; Otros
pt-BR: Variedade de refrigerante: Bebida de cola; Ginger Ale; Cerveja de gengibre; Limão; Laranja; Refrigerante cremoso; Água tônica; Outro
bg-BG: Разновидност на газирани напитки: Кола; Джинджифилов ейл; Джинджифилова бира; Лимон-лайм; Портокал; Крем сода; Тоник; Други
de: Auswahl an Softdrinks: Cola; Ginger Ale; Ingwer-Bier; Zitrone-Limette; Orange; Cream Soda; Tonic Water; Sonstiges
hu: Üdítőital-fajták: Kóla; Gyömbérüdítő; Gyömbérsör; Citrom-lime; Narancs; Szódakrém; Tonikvíz; Egyéb
sv: Läsksort: Cola; Ginger ale; Ingefärsöl; Citron lime; Apelsin; Sodakräm; Tonicvatten; Övrigt
cs: Druh syceného nápoje: Cola; Zázvorová limonáda; Zázvorové pivo; Citrón a limetka; Oranžové; Krémová sodovka; Tonik; Jiné
vi: Loại soda: Cola; Ướp gừng; Bia gừng; Chanh-chanh leo; Vang cam; Kem soda; Nước tăng lực; Khác
zh-CN: 苏打水品种: 可乐; 干姜水; 姜汁啤酒; 青柠檬水; 橙酒; 冰淇淋味苏打水; 汤力水; 其他
en: Soda variety: Cola; Ginger ale; Ginger beer; Lemon-lime; Orange; Soda cream; Tonic water; Other
pl: Odmiana napoju gazowanego: Cola; Ginger ale; Piwo imbirowe; Cytryna-limonka; Pomarańcza; Krem sodowy; Tonik; Inne
fi: Soodavalikoima: Cola; Inkivääriale; Inkivääriolut; Sitruuna-lime; Oranssi; kermasooda; Tonic-vesi; Muu